District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.06

Professional staff.

(a)

The Ethics Board shall select, employ, and fix the compensation for a Director of Government Ethics and such staff as the Ethics Board considers necessary, subject to the pay limitations of § 1-611.16. The Director of Government Ethics shall serve at the pleasure of the Ethics Board. The Ethics Board shall provide to the Director of Government Ethics employees to carry out the powers and duties of the Director of Government Ethics. Employees assigned to the Director of Government Ethics, while so assigned, shall be under the direction and control of the Director of Government Ethics and may not be reassigned without the concurrence of the Director of Government Ethics.

(b)

The Director of Government Ethics shall be a District resident and failure to maintain District residency shall result in forfeiture of the position.

(c)

The staff of the Ethics Board shall be subject to the Code of Conduct, and the Ethics Board shall promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to ensure that all persons responsible for the proper administration of this subchapter maintain a position of strict impartiality and refrain from any activity that would imply support or opposition to an Ethics Board investigation.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 206, 59 DCR 1862

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01.